South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S380.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Transportation, relating to Specific Information Service Signing, designated as Regulation Document Number 5358, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. S.C. Code Section 57-25-170 authorizes SC Department of Transportation to make regulations necessary for regulation of the specific information service signing or known as the LOGO Program. These regulations are being updated to be in compliance with the new language and requirements of the latest version of the FHWA Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices (MUTCD) and to amend the criteria for FOOD sign category to include the requirement of serving prepared food as well as adding reference to SC Reg.61-25. All references to the Department have been changed to SCDOT. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register October 25, 2024. ----XX----